Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.540

Cost disclosure to attending physicians.

(1) The legislature finds that the spiraling costs of nursing home care continue to surmount efforts to contain them, increasing at approximately twice the inflationary rate. The causes of this phenomenon are complex. By making nursing home facilities and care providers more aware of the cost consequences of care services for consumers, these providers may be inclined to exercise more restraint in providing only the most relevant and cost-beneficial services and care, with a potential for reducing the utilization of those services. The requirement of the nursing home to inform physicians, consumers, and other care providers of the charges of the services that they order may have a positive effect on containing health costs.

(2) All nursing home administrators in facilities licensed under this chapter shall be required to develop and maintain a written procedure for disclosing patient charges to attending physicians with admitting privileges. The nursing home administrator shall have the capability to provide an itemized list of the charges for all health care services that may be ordered by a physician. The information shall be made available on request of consumers, or the physicians or other appropriate health care providers responsible for prescribing care.

[ 1993 c 492 s 268.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.